Alabama, session 2026rs, HB137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Page 1

BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
HB137 INTRODUCED
Section 1. Section 29-2-41.1, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§29-2-41.1
(a) In case of an emergency adversely affecting public
health, public safety, or public welfare of the state, so
declared in writing by the Chief Procurement Officer or the
head of a purchasing agency, as defined under Section
41-4-114, setting forth the nature of the danger to public
health, public safety, or public welfare of the state,
contracts may be let to the extent necessary to meet the
emergency without review by the committee.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), for any contract
where the purchasing agency is in the executive branch, in
addition to the written declaration required under subsection
(a), a contract may be let to the extent necessary to meet an
emergency without review by the committee only if the
Governor, prior to the contract going into effect, certifies
to the committee that the nature of the danger to public
health, public safety, or public welfare justifies the need
for an emergency contract. For purposes of this subsection,
executive branch agencies include all licensing boards.
(c) Any contract let pursuant to this section involving
an emergency adversely affecting the public welfare of the
state shall be let for a period of not more than 60 days
during which time the committee shall review a contract for a
longer period of time if such services are required beyond the
60-day limit hereby imposed."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
Page 2

Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
HB137 INTRODUCED
1, 2026.
Page 3